District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-225.06

Cost of advertising.

Repealed.

History

May 30, 1908, 35 Stat. 493, ch. 227
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1103(f), 32 DCR 7396

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1111.
1973 Ed., § 1-809.